New York, session 2025-2026, A10318.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 9 of section 208 of the tax 2 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph 28 to read as follows: 3 (28) For taxable years beginning on or after January first, two thou- 4 sand twenty-five, the amount of any gain excluded pursuant to section 5 1202 of the Internal Revenue Code, with respect to such exclusion the 6 amount of the deduction allowable under section 1202 of the Internal 7 Revenue Code. 8 § 2. Subsection (b) of section 612 of the tax law is amended by adding 9 a new paragraph 44 to read as follows: 10 (44) For taxable years beginning on or after January first, two thou- 11 sand twenty-five, the amount of any gain excluded pursuant to section 12 1202 of the Internal Revenue Code, with respect to such exclusion the 13 amount of the deduction allowable under section 1202 of the Internal 14 Revenue Code. 15 § 3. Paragraph 2 of subdivision (b) of section 1503 of the tax law is 16 amended by adding a new subparagraph (AA) to read as follows: 17 (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after January first, two thou- 18 sand twenty-five, the amount of any gain excluded pursuant to section 19 1202 of the Internal Revenue Code, with respect to such exclusion the 20 amount of the deduction allowable under section 1202 of the Internal 21 Revenue Code. 22 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately, and shall apply to taxa- 23 ble years beginning on or after January 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14477-04-6